Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.125

Standardized high school transcripts.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5189.SL) ***

(1) The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the four-year institutions as defined in RCW 28B.76.020, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the workforce training and education coordinating board, shall develop for use by all public school districts a standardized high school transcript. The superintendent shall establish clear definitions for the terms "credits" and "hours" so that school programs operating on the quarter, semester, or trimester system can be compared.

(2) The standardized high school transcript must include a notation of whether the student has earned the Washington state seal of biliteracy established under RCW 28A.300.575.

[ 2024 c 202 s 5; 2019 c 252 s 111; 2014 c 102 s 3; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 130; 2009 c 556 s 9. Prior: 2006 c 263 s 401; 2006 c 115 s 6; 2004 c 19 s 108; 1984 c 178 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.305.220, 28A.04.155.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 202: See note following RCW 28A.300.577.

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.

Findings—Intent—2014 c 102: See note following RCW 28A.300.575.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Part headings and captions not law—Effective date—2004 c 19: See notes following RCW 28A.230.090.

High school diplomas—Receiving final transcript optional: RCW 28A.230.120.